Arkansas, session 2025, HB1067.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 16, Chapter 120, Subchapter 8, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
16-120-805. Firearms hold agreement — Limitation.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Federal firearms licensee" means a person licensed under 18
U.S.C. §§ 921-934, as they existed on January 1, 2024;
(2) "Firearm" means the same as defined in § 5-1-102; and
(3) "Firearm hold agreement" means a transaction between a
federal firearms licensee and an individual firearm owner in which the
federal firearms licensee takes physical possession of the individual firearm
owner’s lawfully possessed firearm at the owner's request, holds the firearm
for an agreed period of time, and returns the firearm to the individual
firearm owner according to the terms of the transaction.
(b)(1) A federal firearms licensee operating lawfully in the
*CEB037*
02-03-2025 09:47:08 CEB037

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H2/3/25 HB1067
state is immune from civil liability for any act or omission arising from a
firearm hold agreement and resulting in personal injury or death of a person,
including without limitation the return of a firearm to the individual
firearm owner by the federal firearms licensee at the termination of the
firearm hold agreement.
(2) The immunity from civil liability under subdivision (b)(1)
of this section does not apply to an act arising from a firearm hold
agreement if the act was the result of otherwise unlawful conduct on the part
of the federal firearm licensee.

/s/Gramlich

























02-03-2025 09:47:08 CEB037